Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB141.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the
right to speak your truth act.
(b) A person who is the subject of a reported accusation of sexual
misconduct, sexual abuse, sexual assault or sexual harassment shall not
file a defamation action related to the reported accusation unless the
evidence establishes that:
(1) The action is based on a claim that it is impossible for the person
who is the subject of the accusation to have committed the act giving rise
to the reported accusation;
(2) the person making the accusation has been impeached in a court
proceeding related to the same facts giving rise to the reported accusation;
(3) the person making the accusation has publicly made contradictory
statements involving relevant and material facts related to the reported
accusation; or
(4) the person making the accusation has publicly stated that the
sexual misconduct, sexual abuse, sexual assault or sexual harassment
reported in the accusation did not occur.
(c) The provisions of subsection (b) shall only apply when the
accusation of sexual misconduct, sexual abuse, sexual assault or sexual
harassment has been reported, including, but not limited to, reports and
disclosures made to law enforcement, human resources departments or
media outlets or reports made on social media platforms.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.